District of Columbia statutes.
31-4420

Applicability of provisions to existing corporations.

Every company incorporated under the provisions of the laws of the District, or act of Congress, prior to June 19, 1934, is hereby brought under all the provisions of this subdivision, except that its capital may continue in the amount named in its charter during the existing term thereof, unless it extends its business to other kinds of insurance, and it shall be entitled to all privileges granted by such charter not authorized by this law.

June 19, 1934, 48 Stat. 1149, ch. 672, ch. III, § 20
1981 Ed., § 35-620.
1973 Ed., § 35-520.